Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-238
Town meeting; qualifications of electors.

No person shall be a voter at any town meeting unless he shall be a registered voter, and a resident of the town wherein he shall offer to vote.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 36, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 1022;

C.S.1922, § 924;

C.S.1929, § 26-238;

R.S.1943, § 23-238;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 7.